Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0472.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 51f. (1) In addition to the distributions under
subsection (2) and sections 51 and 51d, 51e, from the revenue
collected from the tax levied under section 51 an amount equal to
that portion of the withholding tax capture revenues attributable
to certified new jobs and due to be paid to an authorized business
pursuant to a written agreement entered into under chapter 8D of
the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2090g to
KAS S00973'25 a (S-1) tho9q0


125.2090j, shall must be deposited each state fiscal year into the
good jobs for Michigan fund created in section 90j of the Michigan
strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2090j.
(2) In addition to the distributions under subsection (1) and
sections 51 and 51e, from the revenue collected from the tax levied
under section 51 an amount equal to that portion of the withholding
tax capture revenues attributable to certified new jobs and
protected jobs and due to be paid to an authorized employer
pursuant to a written agreement entered into under chapter 8F of
the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2090t to
125.2090z, must be deposited each state fiscal year into the more
jobs for Michigan fund created in section 90v of the Michigan
strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2090v.
(3) (2) As used in this section, subsection (1), "authorized
business", "certified new jobs", "withholding tax capture
revenues", and "written agreement" mean those terms as defined in
section 90g of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL
125.2090g. As used in subsection (2), "authorized employer",
"certified new jobs", "protected jobs", "withholding tax capture
revenues", and "written agreement" mean those terms as defined in
section 90t of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL
125.2090t.
Sec. 711. (1) Every person required by this part to deduct and
withhold taxes for a tax year on income other than distributive
share of income from a flow-through entity shall furnish to the
person who received the income a statement in duplicate on or
before January 31 of the succeeding year of the total income paid
during the tax year and the amount deducted or withheld. However,
if employment is terminated before the close of a calendar year by
KAS S00973'25 a (S-1) tho9q0


a person that goes out of business or permanently ceases to exist,
then the statement required by this subsection shall must be issued
within 30 days after the last compensation, winnings, or payoff of
a winning ticket is paid. A duplicate of a statement made pursuant
to this section and an annual reconciliation return, MI-W3, shall
must be filed with the department by February 28 of the succeeding
year for tax years before the 2018 tax year and by January 31 of
the succeeding year for the 2018 tax year and each tax year after
2018 except that a person that goes out of business or permanently
ceases to exist shall file the statement and the annual
reconciliation return within 30 days after going out of business or
permanently ceasing to exist. For tax years that begin before July
1, 2016, a flow-through entity that was required to withhold taxes
on distributive shares of business income shall file an annual
reconciliation return with the department no later than the last
day of the second month following the end of the flow-through
entity's federal tax year. The department may require a flow-
through entity to file an annual business income information return
with the department on the due date, including extensions, of its
annual federal information return.
(2) Every person required by this part to deduct or withhold
taxes shall make a return or report in form and content and at
times as prescribed by the department. An employer that has more
than 250 employees shall file its annual return or report required
under this section in electronic form. An employer that has entered
into an agreement with a community college pursuant to under
chapter 13 of the community college act of 1966, 1966 PA 331, MCL
389.161 to 389.166, and is required to deduct or withhold taxes
from compensation and make payments to a community college pursuant
KAS S00973'25 a (S-1) tho9q0


to under the agreement for a portion of those taxes withheld shall,
for as long as the agreement remains in effect, delineate in the
return or report required under this subsection between the amount
deducted or withheld and paid to the state and that amount paid to
a community college. An employer that has entered into a written
agreement pursuant to the good jobs for Michigan program created
under section 90h or chapter 8F of the Michigan strategic fund act,
1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2090h and , 125.2090t to 125.2090z, shall, for
as long as the written agreement remains in effect, delineate in
the return or report required under this subsection the portion of
those taxes withheld and paid to the state that are attributable to
certified new jobs.
(3) Every person who receives income subject to withholding
under this part shall furnish to the person required by this part
to deduct and withhold taxes information required to make an
accurate withholding. A person who receives income subject to
withholding under this part shall file with the person required by
this part to deduct and withhold taxes revised information within
10 days after a decrease in the number of exemptions or a change in
status from a nonresident to a resident. The person who receives
income subject to withholding under this part may file revised
information when the number of exemptions increases or when a
change in status occurs from that of a resident of this state to a
nonresident of this state. Revised information shall not be is not
given retroactive effect for withholding purposes. A person
required by this part to deduct and withhold taxes shall rely on
this information for withholding purposes unless directed by the
department to withhold on some other basis. If a person who
receives income subject to withholding under this part fails or
KAS S00973'25 a (S-1) tho9q0


refuses to furnish information, the person required by this part to
deduct and withhold taxes shall withhold at the full rate of tax
from the person's income subject to withholding under this part.
Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect
unless Senate Bill No. 473 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into
law.
Final Page
KAS S00973'25 a (S-1) tho9q0